Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 155 Business Development Corporations

155.001.
Title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Business Development Corporation Act.”

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 1, effective March 21, 1960.

155.010.
Definitions.

As used in this section and KRS 155.080 and 155.090, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Corporation” means a business development corporation created under this section and KRS 155.080 and 155.090.

“Financial institution” means any banking corporation or public or private pension or retirement fund, trust company, building and loan association, insurance company or related corporation, partnership, foundation, or other institution engaged in lending or investing funds.

“Member” means any financial institution authorized to do business within this Commonwealth which undertakes to lend money to a corporation created under this section and KRS 155.080 and 155.090, upon its call, and in accordance with the provisions of this section and KRS 155.080 and 155.090.

“Board of directors” means the board of directors of the corporation created under this section and KRS 155.080 and 155.090.

“Loan limit” means for any member, the maximum amount permitted to be outstanding at one (1) time on loans made by such member to the corporation, other than short term loans, as determined under the provisions of KRS 155.080 and 155.090.

“Short term loans” means loans to the corporation made for that period not to exceed one (1) year and not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000).

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 2; 1966, ch. 212, § 1.

155.020.
Incorporation — Name — Purposes.

Twenty-five (25) or more persons, a majority of whom are residents of this Commonwealth, who desire to create a business development corporation under the provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of promoting, developing and advancing the prosperity and economic welfare of the Commonwealth and, to that end, to exercise the powers and privileges hereinafter provided, may be incorporated in the following manner. Such persons shall, by articles of incorporation filed with the Secretary of State, signed and acknowledged by them, set forth:

The name of the corporation, which shall include the words “business development corporation”;

The location of the principal office of the corporation, but such corporation may have offices in such other places within the Commonwealth as may be fixed by the board of directors;

The purpose for which the corporation is founded, which shall include the following: The purposes of the corporation shall be to promote, stimulate, develop and advance the business prosperity and economic welfare of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and its citizens; to encourage and assist through loans, investments or other business transactions, in the location of new business and industry in this Commonwealth and to rehabilitate and assist existing business and industry; and so to stimulate and assist in the expansion of all kinds of business activity which will tend to promote the business development and maintain the economic stability of this Commonwealth, provide maximum opportunities for employment, encourage thrift, and improve the standard of living of the citizens of this Commonwealth; similarly, to cooperate and act in conjunction with other organizations, public or private, in the promotion and advancement of industrial, commercial, agricultural and recreational developments in this Commonwealth; and to provide financing for the promotion, development, and conduct of all kinds of business activity in this Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 3, effective March 21, 1960.

155.030.
Powers of corporation.

In furtherance of the purposes set forth in KRS 155.020 above and in addition to the powers conferred on business corporations by the provisions of KRS Chapter 271B, the corporation shall, subject to the restrictions and limitations herein contained, have the following powers:

To elect, appoint and employ officers, agents and employees; to make contracts and incur liabilities for any of the purposes of the corporation; provided, that the corporation shall not incur any secondary liability by way of guaranty or indorsement of the obligations of any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, association, or trust, or in any other manner;

To borrow money from any source including the United States government, or any instrumentality thereof, including the small business administration and similar agencies, for any of the purposes of the corporation; to issue therefor its bonds, debentures, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, whether secured or unsecured, and to secure the same by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust or other lien on its property, franchises, rights and privileges of every kind and nature or any part thereof or interest therein, without stockholder or member approval; provided, that no loan to the corporation shall be secured in any manner unless all outstanding loans to the corporation are secured equally and ratably in proportion to the unpaid balance of such loans and in the same manner;

To make loans to any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, association or trust, and to establish and regulate the terms and conditions with respect to any such loans and the charges for interest and service connected therewith; provided, however, that the corporation shall not approve any application for a loan unless and until the person applying for said loan shall show that he has applied for the loan through ordinary banking channels and that the application has been refused by at least one (1) bank or other financial institution. The corporation may charge interest on such loans at rates of interest not to exceed whichever is the higher of the two (2) following rates: (a) the rate mentioned in KRS 360.010; (b) two percent (2%) in excess of the prime rate prevailing on unsecured commercial loans among the majority of the New York City clearinghouse member banks on the first day of the month in which the loan is made;

To purchase, receive, hold, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to sell, convey, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of real and personal property, together with such rights and privileges as may be incidental and appurtenant thereto and the use thereof, including, but not restricted to, any real or personal property acquired by the corporation from time to time in the satisfaction of debts or enforcement of obligations;

To acquire the good will, business, rights, real and personal property, and other assets, or any part thereof, or interest therein, of any persons, firms, corporations, joint-stock companies, associations, or trusts, and to assume, undertake, or pay the obligations, debts, and liabilities of any such person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, association or trust; to acquire improved or unimproved real estate for the purpose of constructing industrial plants or other business establishments thereon or for the purpose of disposing of such real estate to others for the construction of industrial plants or other business establishments; and to acquire, construct or reconstruct, alter, repair, maintain, operate, sell, convey, transfer, lease, or otherwise dispose of industrial plants or business establishments;

To acquire, subscribe for, own, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of the stock, shares, bonds, debentures, notes or other securities and evidences of interest in, or indebtedness of, any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, association or trust, and while the owner or holder thereof to exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon; and to acquire stock or stock options in the corporation or organization to which it makes loans;

To mortgage, pledge, or otherwise encumber any property, right or thing of value, acquired pursuant to the powers contained in subsections (4), (5), or (6), as security for the payment of any part of the purchase price thereof;

To cooperate with and avail itself of the facilities of the Cabinet for Economic Development and the Industrial Development Finance Authority and any similar governmental or private agencies; and to cooperate with and assist, and otherwise encourage organizations in the various communities of the Commonwealth in the promotion, assistance, and development of the business prosperity and economic welfare of such communities or of this Commonwealth or of any part thereof;

To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers granted in this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 4, effective March 21, 1960; 1980, ch. 188, § 115, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 37, effective July 15, 1982.

155.040.
Contents of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth the amount of total authorized capital stock and the number of shares in which it is divided, the par value of each share, and the amount of capital stock with which the corporation will commence business and, if there is more than one (1) class of stock, a description of the different classes, and the names and post office addresses of the subscribers of stock and the number of shares subscribed by each. The aggregate of the subscription shall be the amount of capital with which the corporation will commence business. The articles of incorporation may also contain any provision consistent with the laws of this Commonwealth for the regulation of the affairs of the corporation or creating, defining, limiting, and regulating its power.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 5, effective March 21, 1960.

155.050.
Approval of Governor — Effective date of incorporation.

Before the said articles of incorporation shall become effective, they must be approved by the Governor, and from the date the said articles of incorporation are filed in the office of the Secretary of State, with such approval, the stock subscribers, their successors and assigns, shall become a body corporate, by the name specified in the articles, subject to amendment and dissolution as provided in this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 6, effective March 21, 1960.

155.060.
First meeting.

The first meeting of the corporation shall be called by a notice signed by three (3) or more of the incorporators, stating the time, place and purpose of the meeting, a copy of which notice shall be mailed, or delivered, to each incorporator at least five (5) days before the day appointed for the meeting. Said first meeting may be held without such notice upon agreement in writing to that effect signed by all the incorporators. There shall be recorded in the minutes of the meeting a copy of said notice or of such unanimous agreement of the incorporators.

At such first meeting the incorporators shall organize by the choice, by ballot, of a temporary clerk, by the adoption of bylaws, by the election by ballot of directors, and by action upon such other matters within the powers of the corporation as the incorporators may see fit. The temporary clerk shall be sworn and shall make and attest a record of the proceedings. Ten (10) of the incorporators shall be a quorum for the transaction of business.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 17, effective March 21, 1960.

155.070.
Powers and limitations of other corporate bodies in relation to corporation.

Notwithstanding any rule at common law or any provision of any general or special law or any provision in their respective charters, agreements of association, articles of organization, or trust indentures: (1) all domestic corporations organized for the purpose of carrying on business within this Commonwealth including without implied limitation any public utility companies and insurance and casualty companies and foreign corporations licensed to do business in the Commonwealth, and all trusts, and private or public pension or retirement funds are hereby authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of any bonds, securities or other evidences of indebtedness created by, or the shares of the capital stock of, the corporation, and while owners of said stock to exercise all the rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon, all without the approval of any regulatory authority of the Commonwealth; (2) all financial institutions are hereby authorized to become members of the corporation and to make loans to the corporation as provided herein; (3) a financial institution which does not become a member of the corporation shall not be permitted to acquire any shares of the capital stock of the corporation; and (4) each financial institution which becomes a member of the corporation is hereby authorized to acquire, purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, any bonds, securities or other evidences of indebtedness created by, or the shares of the capital stock of the corporation, and while owners of said stock to exercise all the rights, powers and privileges of ownership, including the right to vote thereon, all without the approval of any regulatory authority of the Commonwealth; provided, that the amount of the capital stock of the corporation which may be acquired by any member pursuant to the authority granted herein shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the loan limit of such member, except that a public pension or retirement fund which becomes a member may acquire capital stock of the corporation not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the loan limit of such member. The amount of capital stock of the corporation which any member is authorized to acquire pursuant to the authority granted herein is in addition to the amount of capital stock in corporations which such member may otherwise be authorized to acquire.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 7, effective March 21, 1960.

155.080.
Membership — Duty of members — Loan limit formula.

Any financial institution may request membership in the corporation by making application to the board of directors on such form and in such manner as said board of directors may require, and membership shall become effective upon acceptance of such application by said board.

Except for short term loans which members may make at their discretion, each member of the corporation shall make loans to the corporation as and when called upon by it to do so on such terms and other conditions as shall be approved from time to time by the board of directors, subject to the following conditions:

All loan limits shall be established at the thousand dollar ($1,000) amount nearest to the amount computed in accordance with the provisions of this section;

No loan to the corporation shall be made if immediately thereafter the total amount of the obligations of the corporation would exceed twenty (20) times the amount then paid in on the outstanding capital stock of the corporation; and

The total amount outstanding on loan to the corporation made by any member at any one (1) time when added to the amount of the investment in the capital stock of the corporation then held by such member shall not exceed the following limit, to be determined as of the time such member becomes a member on the basis of the audited balance sheet of such member at the close of its fiscal year immediately preceding its application for membership, or, in the case of an insurance company, its last annual statement to the commissioner of insurance:

Two percent (2%) of the capital and surplus of commercial banks and trust companies;

One percent (1%) of the total outstanding loans made by a building and loan association: provided, however, that any business development corporation created pursuant to this section, KRS 155.010 and 155.090 may in its articles of incorporation, or by appropriate amendment thereto, provide that the loan limit of a building and loan association member shall be only one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the total outstanding loans made by such building and loan association member;

One percent (1%) of the capital and unassigned surplus of stock insurance companies, except fire insurance writing companies;

One percent (1%) of the unassigned surplus of mutual insurance companies, except fire insurance writing companies;

One-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the assets of fire insurance writing companies; and

Such limits as may be approved by the board of directors of the corporation for other financial institutions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 8; 1962, ch. 197, § 1; 1966, ch. 212, § 2; 1976, ch. 214, § 9; 2010, ch. 24, § 208, effective July 15, 2010.

155.090.
Distribution among members of loan call — Interest rate.

Each call made by the corporation shall be prorated among the members of the corporation in substantially the same proportion that the adjusted loan limit of each member bears to the aggregate of the adjusted loan limits of all members. The adjusted loan limit of a member shall be the amount of such member’s loan limit, reduced by the balance of outstanding loans made by such member to the corporation, other than short term loans, and the investment in capital stock of the corporation held by such member at the time of such call.

All loans to the corporation by members, other than short term loans, shall be evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of the corporation, which shall be freely transferable at all times, and which shall bear interest at a rate of not less than one-quarter of one percent (0.25%) in excess of the rate of interest as determined by the prime rate prevailing on unsecured commercial loans among the majority of the New York City clearing house member banks on the first day of the month in which the loan is made to the corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 9; 1966, ch. 212, § 3.

155.100.
Duration of membership — Withdrawal.

Membership in the corporation shall be for the duration of the corporation; provided that,

Upon written notice given to the corporation three (3) years in advance, a member may withdraw from membership in the corporation at the expiration date of such notice;

A member shall not be obligated to make any loans to the corporation pursuant to calls made subsequent to the notice of intention to withdraw of said member.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 10, effective March 21, 1960.

155.110.
Powers of members and stockholders — Voting.

The stockholders and members of the corporation shall have the following powers of the corporation:

To determine the number of and elect directors as provided in KRS 155.130;

To make, amend and repeal bylaws;

To amend its articles of incorporation as provided in KRS 155.120;

To exercise such other of the powers of the corporation as may be conferred on the stockholders and the members by the bylaws.

As to all matters requiring action by the stockholders and the members of the corporation, said stockholders and said members shall vote separately thereon by classes, and, except as otherwise herein provided, such matters shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes to which the stockholders present or represented at the meeting are entitled, and the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes to which the members present or represented at the meeting are entitled.

Each stockholder shall have one (1) vote, in person or by proxy, for each share of capital stock held by him, and each member shall have one (1) vote, in person or by proxy, except that any member having a loan limit of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall have one (1) additional vote, in person or by proxy, for each additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) which such member is authorized to have outstanding on loans to the corporation at any one (1) time as determined under paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of KRS 155.080.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 11, effective March 21, 1960.

155.120.
Amendment of articles of incorporation.

Articles of incorporation may be amended by the votes of the stockholders and the members of the corporation, voting separately by classes, and such amendments shall require approval by the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the votes to which the stockholders are entitled and two-thirds (2/3) of the votes to which the members are entitled; provided, that no amendment of the articles of incorporation which is inconsistent with the general purposes expressed herein or which authorizes any additional class of capital stock to be issued, shall be made.

Within thirty (30) days after any meeting at which amendment of the articles of incorporation has been adopted, articles of amendment signed and sworn to by the president, treasurer and a majority of the directors, setting forth such amendment and the due adoption thereof, shall be submitted to the Secretary of State, as provided in KRS Chapter 271B.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 12, effective March 21, 1960; 1980, ch. 188, § 116, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 23, § 175, effective January 1, 1989.

155.130.
Board of directors — Functions — Composition — Freedom from liability.

The business and affairs of the corporation shall be managed and conducted by a board of directors, a president and treasurer, and such other officers and such agents as the corporation by its bylaws shall authorize. The board of directors shall consist of such number, not less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30), as shall be determined in the first instance by the incorporators and thereafter annually by the members and the stockholders of the corporation.

The board of directors may exercise all the powers of the corporation except such as are conferred by law or by the bylaws of the corporation upon the stockholders or members and shall choose and appoint all the agents and officers of the corporation and fill all vacancies, except vacancies in the office of director, which shall be filled as hereinafter provided.

The board of directors shall be elected in the first instance by the incorporators and thereafter at each annual meeting of the corporation, or if no annual meeting is held in any year at the time fixed by the bylaws, at a special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting. At each annual meeting, or at each special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting, the members of the corporation shall elect two-thirds (2/3) of the board of directors and the stockholders shall elect the remaining directors. The directors shall hold office until the next annual meeting of the corporation or special meeting held in lieu of the annual meeting after their election and until their successors are elected and qualified unless sooner removed in accordance with the provisions of the bylaws. Any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the members shall be filled by the directors elected by the members, and any vacancy in the office of a director elected by the stockholders shall be filled by the directors elected by the stockholders.

Directors and officers shall not be responsible for losses unless the same shall have been occasioned by the willful misconduct of such directors and officers.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 13; 1962, ch. 197, § 2.

155.140.
Required earned surplus.

Each year the corporation shall set apart as earned surplus not less than ten percent (10%) of its net earnings for the preceding fiscal year until such surplus is equal in value to one-half (1/2) of the amount paid in on the capital stock then outstanding. Whenever the amount of surplus established herein becomes impaired, it shall be built up again to the required amount in the manner provided for its original accumulation. Net earnings and surplus shall be determined by the board of directors, after providing for such reserves as said directors deem desirable, and the directors’ determination made in good faith shall be conclusive on all persons.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 14, effective March 21, 1960.

155.150.
Restrictions on deposits.

The corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any banking institution unless such institution has been designated as a depository by a vote of a majority of the directors present at an authorized meeting of the board of directors, exclusive of any director who is an officer or director of the depository so designated.

The corporation shall not receive money on deposit except for purposes stated in this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 15, effective March 21, 1960.

155.160.
Regulation by state officials.

The corporation shall be subject to the examination of the commissioner of the Department of Financial Institutions, and shall make reports of its condition not less often than annually to said commissioner, who in turn shall make copies of such reports available to the commissioner of insurance and to the Governor. The corporation shall also furnish such other information as may from time to time be required by the Secretary of State.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 16, effective March 21, 1960; 2010, ch. 24, § 209, effective July 15, 2010.

155.170.
Excise tax on corporations — Report — Items free from taxation — Credit for losses.

An annual excise tax is hereby levied on every corporation organized under this chapter for the privilege of transacting business in this Commonwealth during the calendar year, according to or measured by its entire net income, as defined herein, received or accrued from all sources during the preceding calendar year, hereinafter referred to as taxable year, at the rate of four and one-half percent (4.5%) of such entire net income. The minimum tax assessable to any one (1) such corporation shall be ten dollars ($10). The liability for the tax imposed by this section shall arise upon the first day of each calendar year, and shall be based upon and measured by the entire net income of each such corporation for the preceding calendar year, including all income received from government securities in such year. As used in this section the words “taxable year” mean the calendar year next preceding the calendar year for which and during which the excise tax is levied.

The excise tax levied under subsection (1) of this section shall be in lieu of the taxes imposed by KRS 141.040 and the taxes imposed by KRS 141.0401. It is the purpose and intent of the General Assembly to levy taxes on corporations organized pursuant to this chapter so that all such corporations will be taxed uniformly in a just and equitable manner in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. The intent of this section is for the General Assembly to exercise the powers of classification and of taxation on property, franchises, and trades conferred by Section 171 of the Constitution of the Commonwealth.

On or before June 1 of each year, the executive officer or officers of each corporation shall file with the commissioner of the Department of Revenue a full and accurate report of all income received or accrued during the taxable year, and also an accurate record of the legal deductions in the same calendar year to the end that the correct entire net income of the corporation may be determined. This report shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner of the Department of Revenue may specify. At the time of making such report by each corporation, the taxes levied by this section with respect to an excise tax on corporations organized pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the commissioner of the Department of Revenue.

The securities, evidences of indebtedness, and shares of the capital stock issued by the corporation established under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer, and income therefrom and deposits of financial institutions invested therein, shall at all times be free from taxation within the Commonwealth.

Any stockholder, member, or other holder of any securities, evidences of indebtedness, or shares of the capital stock of the corporation who realizes a loss from the sale, redemption, or other disposition of any securities, evidences of indebtedness, or shares of the capital stock of the corporation, including any such loss realized on a partial or complete liquidation of the corporation, and who is not entitled to deduct such loss in computing any of such stockholder’s, member’s, or other holder’s taxes to the Commonwealth shall be entitled to credit against any taxes subsequently becoming due to the Commonwealth from such stockholder, member, or other holder, a percentage of such loss equivalent to the highest rate of tax assessed for the year in which the loss occurs upon mercantile and business corporations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 18, effective March 21, 1960; 2005, ch. 168, § 35, effective January 1, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 67, effective June 28, 2006; 2019 ch. 151, § 73, effective June 27, 2019.

155.180.
Duration of corporation.

The period of duration of a corporation organized under this chapter shall be perpetual.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 19, effective March 21, 1960; 1976, ch. 214, § 10.

155.190.
Effect of failure of any corporation to organize, or of organized corporation to begin doing business.

If a corporation organized pursuant to this chapter fails to begin business within three (3) years from the effective date of its certificate of incorporation, then said certificate shall become null and void. If, within three (3) years from March 21, 1960, no corporation is organized pursuant to this chapter, then and in that event, this chapter shall become null and void.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 20, effective March 21, 1960.

155.200.
Credit of Commonwealth is not pledged.

Under no circumstances is the credit of the Commonwealth pledged herein.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 73, § 21, effective March 21, 1960.

155.210.
Specified late charges for default of loan and litigation charges treated as liquidated damages.

A business development corporation may require as a part of any loan made by it, that in the event of a default by the borrower in the repayment or other terms of the loan obligation, the borrower shall pay late charges of a specified amount of up to five percent (5%) per month of the amount of the monthly installment in arrears. Moreover, a business development corporation may require that in the event any litigation becomes necessary as a consequence of the borrower’s default, the borrower shall further be liable for a specified amount of up to two percent (2%) of the unpaid principal balance owed on such loan. Such provisions shall be treated as liquidated damages and shall be valid and enforceable by the courts for all purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 360, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

155.220.
Interest on judgment for collection or repayment of defaulted loan.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, and regardless of the legal rate of interest, in any case brought by a business development corporation to obtain the collection or repayment of a defaulted loan, as part of a successful judgment against the debtor or guarantor the business development corporation shall be entitled to an award of interest thereon at the rate of interest provided in the loan documents executed by the debtor pertaining to the defaulted loan, and the rate of interest shall run and shall be payable until the judgment is satisfied in full.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 360, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

155.230.
Reasonable attorneys’ fees, provision for.

In any legal action brought by a business development corporation to obtain the collection or repayment of a defaulted loan, as part of a successful judgment against the debtor or guarantor the business development corporation shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred in the recovery of the defaulted loan, provided that a provision therefor is contained in the loan documents signed by the debtor or guarantor as part of a loan transaction between the debtor or guarantor and the business development corporation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 360, § 3, effective July 15, 1980.